test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-konksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - konkš: # Noun 70 'eng /est konks/fin' - full paradigm
     konkš+N+Sg+Nom: konkš
     konkš+N+Sg+Gen: konkš
     konkš+N+Sg+Par: konkšõ
     konkš+N+Sg+Dat: konkšõn
     konkš+N+Sg+Ins: konkšõks
     konkš+N+Sg+Ill: konkšõ
     konkš+N+Sg+Ela: konkšõst
     konkš+N+Pl+Nom: kōnkšid
     konkš+N+Pl+Gen: kōnkšid
     konkš+N+Pl+Par: kōnkšidi
     konkš+N+Pl+Dat: kōnkšidõn
     konkš+N+Pl+Ins: kōnkšiõdõks
     konkš+N+Pl+Ill: kōnkšiz
     konkš+N+Pl+Ela: kōnkšist
